District of Columbia statutes.
42-514

Expectant estates — No defeat or bar unless provided for at creation.

No expectant estate can be defeated or barred by any alienation or other act of the owner of the intermediate or precedent estate, nor by any destruction of such precedent estate, by disseizin, forfeiture, surrender, merger, or otherwise, except when such destruction is expressly provided for or authorized in the creation of such expectant estate; nor shall an expectant estate thus liable to be defeated be on that ground adjudged void in its creation.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1352, ch. 854, § 1029

History

1981 Ed., § 45-214.
1973 Ed., § 45-814.

Prior Codifications